Utah statutes.
70A-2a-530.   Lessor's incidental damages.
Incidental damages to an aggrieved lessor include any commercially reasonable
charges, expenses, or commissions incurred in stopping delivery, in the
transportation, care, and custody of goods after the lessee's default, in
connection with return or disposition of the goods, or otherwise resulting
from the default.
